src/adj-kmr-lex.txt
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Adjectives
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON AdjRoot

nû:nû nû__adj ; ! lm="nû" :: "new"
xur:xur nû__adj ; ! lm="xur" :: "strong"
pêwist:pêwis pêwis/t__adj; ! lm="pêwist" :: "important"

LEXICON nû__adj

+Adj+Pst:%> #;
+Adj+Comp:%>tir # ;
+Adj+Sup:%>tirîn # ;

LEXICON pêwis/t__adj

+Adj+Pst:%>t #;
+Adj+Comp:%>tir # ;
+Adj+Sup:%>tirîn # ;
